en: Sweet chili sauces, Thai sweet chili sauces, sweet chilli sauces
cs: Sladká chilli omáčka
cy: Saws tsili melys
fa: سس چیلی شیرین
jv: Saos pedhes legi
ko: 스위트 칠리 소스, 남 찜 까이
sv: Söta chilisåser
th: น้ำจิ้มไก่
zh: 甜椒酱, 泰式雞醬

en: Sriracha sauces
xx: Sriracha
fr: Sauces sriracha
hr: Sriracha umaci
lt: Sriracha padažai
nl: Srirachasauzen
pl: Sriracha, Sosy sriracha
sv: Srirachasåser

en: Sambal
xx: Sambal
nl: Sambals

en: Sambal oelek
xx: Sambal oelek

en: Pepper sauces
de: Pfeffersaucen
fi: chilikastikkeet
fr: Sauces au poivre, Sauce au poivre
hr: Umaci od papra
hu: Paprikaszósz, Papriaka mártás
lt: Pipirų padažai
nl: Pepersauzen
sv: Pepparsåser

en: Sauce pepper prepacked
fr: Sauce au poivre condimentaire froide

en: Green pepper sauces
fr: Sauces au poivre vert, sauce poivre vert
hr: Umaci od zelenog papra
hu: zöldpaprika mártások
lt: Žaliųjų pipirų padažai

en: Fried potato sauces
nl: Fritessauzen, Fritessaus

en: Mayonnaises, Mayo
bg: Майонеза
ca: Maioneses
da: Mayonnaiser
de: Mayonnaisen, Mayo
es: Mayonesas, Mahonesas
fi: majoneesit
fr: Mayonnaises
he: מיונז
hr: majoneza
hu: Majonéz
it: Maionese
ja: マヨネーズ
lt: Majonezai
nl: Mayonaises
pl: Majonezy, Majonez
pt: Maioneses, maionese
ru: Майонез
sv: Majonnäser
tr: Mayonez

en: Sunflower oil mayonnaises
bg: Майонеза със слънчогледово олио
es: Mayonesas con aceite de girasol
fr: Mayonnaises à l’huile de tournesol, Mayonnaise à l’huile de tournesol
hr: Majoneze od suncokretovog ulja
hu: Napraforgó olajos majonéz
lt: Saulėgrąžų aliejų padažai
nl: Mayonnaises op basis van zonnebloemolie
pl: Majonezy z oleju słonecznikowego
ru: Майонезы на подсолнечном масле

en: Mayonnaise with caramelized onion
es: Mayonesas con cebolla caramelizada
fr: Mayonnaises à l'oignon caramélisé
hr: Majoneza s karameliziranim lukom
lt: Majonezai su karamelizuotais svogūnais

en: Dijon mayonnaises, Dijonnaises, Dijonnaise
da: Dijonnaiser, Dijon-mayonnaiser
de: Dijon-Mayonnaisen
es: Mayonesas de Dijon
fi: Dijon-majoneesit
fr: Mayonnaises de Dijon, Mayonnaise de Dijon, Mayonnaise à la moutarde de Dijon, Mayonnaises à la moutarde de Dijon, Mayonaises de Dijon
he: מיונז דיז'ון
hr: Dijon majoneze
hu: Dijoni majonéz
it: Maionese di Digione
lt: Dižono majonezai
nl: Dijonmayonnaises
sv: Dijonnäser, Dijon-majonnäser

en: Light mayonnaises, Reduced fat mayonnaise, Low fat mayonnaise, Light mayonnaise
bg: Лека майнонеза
de: Leichte Mayonnaisen
es: Mayonesas ligeras, Mayonesas light
fi: kevytmajoneesit
fr: Mayonnaises allégées, Mayonnaises allégées en matières grasses, Mayonnaises allégées en matière grasse, Mayonnaise à teneur réduite en matière grasse, Mayonnaise allégée
hr: Lagane majoneze
it: Maionese light, Maionese leggera
lt: Majonezai su mažiau riebalų
nl: Light mayonnaises, Halvanaises
pl: Majonezy light, Majonezy z niską zawartością tłuszczu

en: 70% fat mayonnaise
fr: Mayonnaise à 70% de matière grasse
hr: Majoneza sa 70% masti
lt: 70% riebumo majonezai, Majonezai 70% riebumo
zh: 70%脂肪蛋黄酱

en: Mojo sauces, Mojos
es: Mojos
fr: Mojos, Sauce mojo
hr: Mojo umaci

en: Rouille sauces, mayonnaise flavoured with garlic chilli pepper and fish broth, Rouille flavoured with garlic chilli pepper and fish broth
fr: Sauce rouille

en: Mustards, Mustard
bg: Горчица
ca: Mostassa
cs: Hořčice
da: Sennep
de: Senfe, Senf
es: Salsas de mostaza, Mostazas
fi: sinapit
fr: Moutardes, moutarde, Moustarde
he: חרדלים
hr: senf
hu: Mustárok
it: Senapi
ja: マスタード
lt: Garstyčios
nl: Mosterds
pl: Musztardy, Musztarda
pt: Mostardas
ro: Muștar
ru: Горчица
sv: Senap
th: มัสตาร์ด
tr: Hardal

en: Sauces with mustard
fr: Sauces à la moutarde
hr: Umaci sa senfom
lt: Padažai su garstyčiomis

en: Remoulade sauces, Remoulade sauce
da: Remoulader, Remulader
fr: Rémoulade, Sauce Rémoulade
nb: Remulader
nn: Remuladar
sv: Remouladsåser

en: Plant-based remoulade sauces, Vegan remoulade sauces
da: Plantebaserede remoulader, Veganske remoulader
sv: Växtbaserade remouladsåser, Veganska remouladsåser